Arkansas, session 2025, HB1116.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:
*JLL076*
03-13-2025 09:45:21 JLL076

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 HB1116

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Remote and Mobile Work
Modernization and Competitiveness Act".

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Remote and hybrid work is a fast-growing trend in the United
States;
(2) Surveys have found that thirteen percent (13%) of employees
in the United States work from home, and twenty-eight percent (28%) work a
hybrid model;
(3) Arkansas's tax code has been found to be ranked forty-fifth
out of the fifty (50) states because of its complicated and burdensome filing
and withholding requirements;
(4) Remote and mobile work can be an opportunity to states
willing to make their tax codes hospitable and convenient to remote and
mobile workers; and
(5) While the state has an understandable desire to collect
taxes owed by individuals who spend significant time working in the state,
there is no compelling reason to place an outsized burden on those briefly
passing through the state, particularly those who have no income tax
liability.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 26-51-202, concerning the application of
income tax laws to nonresidents, is amended to add an additional subsection
to read as follows:
(f)(1) The Department of Finance and Administration may enter into a
reciprocity agreement with another state to exempt residents of the other
state who earn income in this state from the tax levied under this chapter if
the other state has a provision in its tax laws that provides an income tax
exemption to Arkansas residents.
(2) The department shall not enter into a reciprocity agreement
under subdivision (f)(1) of this section unless the reciprocity agreement has
been reviewed and approved by the Legislative Council.

03-13-2025 09:45:21 JLL076

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 HB1116
SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 51, Subchapter 3, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-51-317. Remote and mobile employees.
There is allowed an exemption from the income tax imposed by this
chapter for income received by an individual as compensation for employment
duties performed by the individual while he or she was present in the state
if:
(1) The total aggregate amount of income received by the
individual for employment duties performed while the individual was present
in the state is two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or less for the
tax year; and
(2) The individual performed employment duties for an employer
in more than one (1) state during the tax year.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 26-51-905 is amended to read as follows:
26-51-905. Withholding of tax.
(a)(1) Every Except as otherwise provided in this section, an employer
making payments of wages to employees shall deduct and withhold from the
employees' wages an amount determined from withholding tables promulgated by
the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration and furnished
to the employer.
(2) The full amount deducted and withheld from any an employee's
wages during the income year shall be credited against the tax liability of
the employee under the Income Tax Act of 1929, § 26-51-101 et seq., for that
year.
(b)(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this
section, every an employer who withholds less than one thousand dollars
($1,000) for a full year's withholding shall report and remit annually on a
date specified by the secretary any amounts so withheld by the employer.
(2) An employer shall be advised by the secretary of the
employer's classification and shall report as classified until such time as
the employer advises the secretary in writing that the employer no longer has
employees or the employer is closing the business.
(3) However, it shall be the duty of the employer to report to
the secretary at the end of each income year all wages paid to any such
employees on the same forms provided in this subchapter for making employer
03-13-2025 09:45:21 JLL076

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 HB1116
annual withholding statements in order that the secretary may determine the
tax liability, if any, of those employees during that income year.
(c)(1) An employer is not required to deduct and withhold from an
employee's wages the amount determined from the withholding tables
promulgated by the secretary and furnished to the employer if:
(A) The employee performed employment duties while the
employee was present in the state for fifteen (15) or fewer calendar days
during the tax year;
(B) The employee performed employment duties for the
employer in more than one (1) state during the tax year; and
(C) The employee is not being paid for employment duties
performed in the employee's capacity as:
(i) An athlete who receives wages for performing
services in a professional athletic event;
(ii) An entertainer who receives wages on a per-
event basis for performing services in the professional performing arts; or
(iii) A public figure who receives wages on a per-
event basis for performing services at discrete events, including without
limitation speeches, public appearances, and similar events.
(2) If an employee performs employment duties for an employer
while the employee was present in the state for more than fifteen (15)
calendar days during the tax year, the employer shall withhold and remit
taxes for every day the employee performed employment duties while present in
this state during the tax year, including the first fifteen (15) days in
which the employee performed employment duties in this state.
(3)(A) For purposes of this subsection, an employee is
considered present and performing employment duties in this state for a day
if the employee performs more of the employee's employment duties in this
state than in any other state during that day.
(B) A portion of a day during which an employee is in
transit shall not be considered in determining the location of the employee's
performance of employment duties.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 26-51-916 is amended to read as follows:
26-51-916. Employer liable for amounts required to be withheld —
Exceptions — Definition.
03-13-2025 09:45:21 JLL076

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 HB1116
(a) As used in this section, "time and attendance system" means a
system:
(1) Through which an employee is required to record the
employee's work location for every day worked outside the state where the
employee's employment duties are primarily performed; and
(2) That is designed to allow an employer to allocate an
employee's wages for income tax purposes among all states in which the
employee performs employment duties for the employer.
(b)(1) Every Except as otherwise provided in this section, an employer
shall be liable for amounts required to be deducted and withheld by this
subchapter regardless of whether or not the amounts were in fact deducted and
withheld.
(2) However, if the employer fails to deduct and withhold the
required amounts and if the tax against which the required amounts would have
been credited is paid, the employer shall not be liable for those amounts not
deducted and withheld if the failure was due to reasonable cause.
(c) An employer is not liable for any penalties or interest otherwise
applicable for failing to deduct and withhold the amount required under this
subchapter from the wages of an employee who performed employment duties for
the employer in more than one (1) state if the employer:
(1) Maintains a time and attendance system specifically designed
to allocate employee wages for income tax purposes among all taxing
jurisdictions in which the employee performs employment duties for the
employer and relies on data from the time and attendance system in making its
determination regarding whether withholding is required; or
(2) Does not maintain a time and attendance system and relies on
one (1) or more of the following in making its determination regarding
whether withholding is required:
(A) The employer's own records, maintained in the regular
course of business, concerning the employee's location while performing his
or her employment duties;
(B) The employee's reasonable determination of the time
the employee expected to spend performing employment duties in the state, if
the employer did not:
(i) Have actual knowledge of fraud on the part of
the employee in making the determination; or
03-13-2025 09:45:21 JLL076

As Engrossed: H3/13/25 HB1116
(ii) Conspire with the employee to evade taxation in
making the determination;
(C) Travel records;
(D) Travel expense reimbursement records; or
(E) A signed, written statement from the employee of the
time spent performing employment duties for the employer in the state during
the tax year.

SECTION 7. DO NOT CODIFY. Severability.
The provisions of this act are severable, and the invalidity of any
provision of this act shall not affect other provisions of this act that can
be given effect without the invalid provision.

SECTION 8. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1-6 of this act are effective for
tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.

/s/Ray



















03-13-2025 09:45:21 JLL076